Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 25

Dietetics/Nutrition Practice Act

63-25-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Dietetics/Nutrition Practice Act.”

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 2.

63-25-102. Legislative findings.

The general assembly finds that the application of scientific knowledge relating to food is important in the treatment of illness and disease and the attainment and maintenance of health. There are currently no clear means for the public to identify the qualifications of persons providing dietetic services and nutritional care for infants, children, pregnant females, elderly persons, poor persons, overweight persons, chronically and terminally ill persons and fitness enthusiasts. Consumers and patients are becoming increasingly concerned about their diets and nutrition as well as the effectiveness of the information and services being offered to the public. The general assembly further finds that in order to protect the public health, safety and welfare, it is necessary to define the qualifications and requirements for persons offering certain dietetic and nutritional advice and services to the public. It is the purpose of this chapter to restrict the use of certain titles to persons who are professionally qualified to use them, thereby ensuring that persons practicing the profession of dietetics and nutrition meet minimum standards of proficiency and competency acquired through adequate training and experience.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 3.

63-25-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of dietitian/nutritionist examiners;

“Department” means the department of health;

“Dietetics/nutrition practice” means the integration and application of scientific principles of food, nutrition, biochemistry, physiology, management and behavioral and social sciences in achieving and maintaining health through the life cycle and in the treatment of disease. Methods of practice include, but are not limited to, nutritional assessment, development, implementation and evaluation of nutrition care plans, nutritional counseling and education, and the development and administration of nutrition care standards and systems;

“Dietitian” and “nutritionist” may be used interchangeably;

“Dietitian/nutritionist” means a health care professional practicing dietetics/nutrition and licensed under this chapter; and

“Division” means the division of health related boards within the department.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 4.

63-25-104. Prohibited representations — License required — Construction.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in the practice of dietetics/nutrition, to act or represent such person to be a dietitian or a nutritionist or to use such titles as “dietitian/nutritionist,” “licensed dietitian,” “licensed nutritionist,” or such letters as “L.D.,” “L.N.,” or any facsimile thereof, or any word, letters or title indicating or implying that such person is a dietitian/nutritionist, unless such person holds a license and otherwise complies with this chapter and the rules and regulations adopted by the board.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to affect, prevent or restrict:

Persons qualified and licensed to practice other health professions from engaging in the practice of dietetics/nutrition when incidental to the practice of their profession. This chapter shall in no way apply to persons licensed to practice medicine or osteopathic medicine pursuant to chapters 6 and 9 of this title;

Students enrolled in an approved academic program in dietetics, if such practice constitutes a part of a supervised course of study and such student is designated by title clearly indicating such student's status as a student or trainee;

A dietitian serving in the armed forces or the public health service of the United States or employed by the veterans administration from engaging in the practice of dietetics; provided, that such practice is related to such service or employment;

Persons performing the activities and services of a nutrition educator in the employment of a federal, state, county or municipal agency or an elementary or secondary school or accredited degree granting educational institution, insofar as such activities and services are part of a salaried position;

Federal, state, county or local employees involved with nutrition-related programs, including, but not limited to, the cooperative extension service, child nutrition programs and Project Headstart from engaging in the practice of dietetics/nutrition within the discharge of their official duties; provided, that any such person engaging in dietetic/nutrition practice outside the scope of such official duty must be licensed as provided in this section;

Persons employed in a hospital or nursing home as defined in § 68-11-201 and subject to licensure by the Tennessee board for licensing health care facilities; or

Persons who do not hold themselves out to be licensed and/or registered dietitians/nutritionists of the right to provide services and information related to nonmedical nutrition while:

Conducting classes or disseminating information related to non-medical nutrition.

Employed by or operating a business that sells health products, including dietary supplements, food or food materials, or provides nonmedical nutritional information or distributes nutritional literature; or

Employed by or operating a health food store;

Employed by or operating a health weight loss or fitness program;

“Nonmedical” means engaging in any practice that does not constitute the practice of medicine, osteopathy, chiropractic, dentistry or podiatry.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 5; 1994, ch. 901, § 4.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-25-105. Development of therapeutic dietary regimens.

No therapeutic dietary regimen may be developed unless pursuant to the appropriate orders and/or referral of licensed practitioners of medicine, osteopathy, chiropractic, dentistry or podiatry when incidental to the practice of their respective professions.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 6.

63-25-106. Board of dietitian/nutritionist examiners.

There is hereby created the board of dietitian/nutritionist examiners to consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor, each of whom shall be a resident of this state and shall have had at least five (5) years' experience in the actual practice or teaching of dietetics and/or nutrition. Appointments may be made from lists of qualified persons submitted to the governor by interested dietitian/nutritionist, hospital and medical groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Dietetic Association, the Tennessee Hospital Association, and the Tennessee Medical Association, and shall represent such areas of practice as administrative dietetics, clinical dietetics, dietetic education, community nutrition and consultation and private practice. The governor shall consult with such interested groups to determine qualified persons to fill the positions.

Of the initial appointments to the board, two (2) members shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years, two (2) members for a term of two (2) years, and one (1) member for a term of one (1) year. All regular appointments thereafter shall be for terms of three (3) years each. No member shall be eligible for appointment for more than two (2) consecutive terms, and each member shall serve on the board until a successor is appointed. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the governor for the unexpired term. In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

The board shall organize annually and select a chair and a secretary. A quorum of the board shall consist of three (3) members, and meetings of the board shall be held as frequently as its duties may require. The division shall perform administrative functions for the board.

Each member of the board shall receive compensation for services in an amount determined by the department, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per diem when actually engaged in the discharge of their official duties, and, in addition, shall be reimbursed for all travel expenses in accordance with the comprehensive state travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 7; 1988, ch. 1013, § 59; 2012, ch. 722, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. The board of dietitian/nutritionist examiners, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

63-25-107. Powers and duties of board.

In addition to the powers granted elsewhere in this chapter, the board has the duty to:

Promulgate, in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, all rules that are reasonably necessary for the performance of the various duties imposed upon the board in the proper administration of this chapter;

Set fees, after consultation with the department and subject to the maximum limitations prescribed in this chapter, relative to the application, examination, licensing and renewal thereof in amounts sufficient to pay all of the expenses of the board directly attributable to the performance of its duties pursuant to this chapter;

Review and approve or reject the qualifications of applicants for licensure and to issue, in the board's name, all approved licenses, certificates and permits;

Collect or receive all fees, fines and moneys owed pursuant to this chapter and to pay the same into the general fund of the state. For purposes of implementing subdivision (2), the board shall designate any such fees, fines or moneys collected pursuant to the regulation of dietitians/nutritionists; and

Deny, suspend or revoke the license of or to otherwise discipline by an administrative penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500), or by reprimand, a license holder who is guilty of violating any provisions of this chapter or who is guilty of violating the rules and regulations of the board duly promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 8.

63-25-108. Applications for licensure.

An applicant for licensure as a dietitian/nutritionist shall file a written application on forms provided by the department or via online application showing to the satisfaction of the board that such person:

Is of good moral character;

Has received a baccalaureate or post-baccalaureate degree from a regionally accredited college or university that provides a major course of study in human nutrition, food and nutrition, dietetics, or food systems management, or an equivalent major course of study as approved by the board;

Has successfully completed a planned continuous preprofessional experience in nutrition practice of not less than nine hundred (900) hours under the supervision of a registered dietitian, or successfully completed a program of supervised clinical experience approved by the commission on dietetic registration of the American Dietetic Association; and

Has passed the national examination prepared and administered by the commission on dietetic registration of the American Dietetic Association.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 9; 2014, ch. 949, § 15.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-25-109. Issuance of licenses — Temporary permits.

The board may, in its discretion, issue a license to an applicant upon such person providing evidence of current registration as a registered dietitian and upon payment of a licensing fee. The board may further waive the examination, education or experience requirements of this chapter and grant a license to an applicant who shall present proof of current licensure, certification or registration as a dietitian under the laws of another state, the District of Columbia, or territory of the United States, if, in the board's opinion, the educational and experiential qualifications and requirements were substantially equivalent to those required for licensure in this state.

The board may, in its discretion, issue temporary permits to practice dietetics/nutrition to an applicant upon submission of satisfactory evidence that such person:

Has successfully completed the academic and experiential requirements to be licensed as a dietitian/nutritionist;

Has applied for or taken a licensing examination;

Is awaiting notification of examination results; and

Has paid the fee required for temporary permits.

Temporary permits expire one (1) year from the date of issuance and may be renewed for a period not to exceed six (6) months upon submitting to the board a satisfactory explanation of the applicant's failure to become licensed within the one-year term.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, §§ 10, 11.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-25-110. Disciplinary action.

The board is empowered to deny or refuse to renew a license, or suspend or revoke a license or permit, or issue orders to cease and desist from certain conduct or to otherwise lawfully discipline an applicant, a licensee, a permittee or a person found guilty of violating any provisions of this chapter when such person has:

Attempted or obtained licensure by fraud or misrepresentation;

Engaged in unethical or unprofessional conduct, including, but not limited to, willful acts, negligence or a pattern of continued and repeated health care liability, negligence or incompetence in the course of professional practice;

Engaged in habitual intoxication or personal misuse of any drug, narcotic, controlled substance or controlled substance analogue so as to adversely affect the person's ability to practice;

Been convicted of a felony or any offense under state or federal laws involving moral turpitude;

Violated any lawful order, rule or regulation rendered or adopted by the board; or

Violated any provision of this chapter.

All administrative proceedings for disciplinary action against a license holder or permittee shall be conducted by the board in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The board shall promulgate rules governing the assessment of costs against a licensee or other person found by the board to have violated any provision of this chapter. The costs assessed by the board may include only those costs directly related to the prosecution of the charges against the licensee or other person, including investigatory costs where appropriate. The board shall determine the appropriate amount of costs, if any, to be assessed in a contested case. These costs shall be reasonable and proportionate in light of the violation committed by the licensee or other person.

Any elected officer of the board, or any duly appointed or elected chair has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses. Upon probable cause being established, the board, by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members to which the board is entitled, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and records.

Service of a subpoena issued by the board shall be made by the sheriff of the county of residence of the licensee or person upon whom the subpoena is served.

A licensee or person served by subpoena shall have thirty (30) days to request in writing a hearing before the board for the sole purpose of making a special appearance to quash or modify the subpoena. The subpoena for attendance of the person or the production of books and records shall be stayed until the board votes upon the request to quash or modify the subpoena. A majority vote of the members to which the board is entitled shall be required to quash or modify a subpoena.

A motion to appeal from a decision by the board regarding a request to quash or modify a subpoena shall be made to the chancery court in Davidson County within fifteen (15) days of such decision.

If any witness fails or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by it, the board is authorized to make application to any court of record in this state within the jurisdiction of which the witness is found or resides, and the court shall have power to attach the body of the witness and compel the witness to appear before the board and give testimony or produce books, records or papers as ordered. Any failure to obey the court order may be punished by the court issuing the order as a civil contempt.

Each witness who appears before the board by order of the board shall receive for attendance the compensation provided by law for attendance of witnesses in a court of record, which shall be paid from the funds of the board in the same manner as all other expenses of the board are paid.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 12; 1999, ch. 441, § 3; 2012, ch. 798, § 48; 2012, ch. 848, § 81; 2018, ch. 745, § 39.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Attorney General Opinions. The board of dietitian/nutritionist examiners has authority to issue administrative subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents prior to the commencement of an administrative action, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).

63-25-111. Fees.

For the purpose of implementing this chapter, the board, by duly promulgated rule, shall establish fees for applications, examinations, renewals, reciprocity and other related matters.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 13; 1989, ch. 523, § 214.

Cross-References. License and registration fee, § 63-1-112.

Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-25-112. Failure to renew license or pay fee — Revocation and reinstatement of license.

A licensee who fails to renew the licensee's license and to pay the biannual renewal fee after renewal becomes due shall have the license automatically revoked without further notice of hearing, unless renewal is made and all fees paid prior to the expiration of sixty (60) days from the date such renewal becomes due.

Any person whose license is automatically revoked as provided in this section may have the license reinstated by the board in its discretion for good cause being shown, upon payment of all past-due renewal fees and upon the further payment of a nonrefundable sum as set by the board.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 13; 1989, ch. 523, § 215.

Cross-References. License and registration fee, § 63-1-112.

Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-25-113. Retirees.

Any person licensed to practice by this chapter, who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state, shall not be made to register as required by this chapter if such person files with this board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit states the date on which such person retired from such practice, and such other facts as tend to verify such retirement as the board deems necessary. If such person reengages in such practice in this state, such person shall apply for licensure with the board as provided by this chapter, and shall meet other requirements as may be set by the board.

Acts 1987, ch. 384, § 13.

Cross-References. Retirement, § 63-1-111.